epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/de_1901.xml
		4x1t
		x2t1a
		x3ta.
		x3t2as
		xt1ä
		x2tän
		x2t1e2d
		x2t1ei
		x2tent
		x2t1er2f
		x2t3ev
		xtfi4
		x2t1il2l
		xtra3b4
		x2t3ran
		xt1s2
		xt1u
		x3t2ur
		1xu
		xu1a
		x1u2n
		xu2s
		2xv
		2x1w
		2xy
		3xy.
		3xys
		x1z
		2y1ab
		1yac
		y1al.
		y1a2m
		yan2g
		y1ank
		y1ät
		y1b
		y1c2
		y2chi
		y3chis
		ych3n
		y1d4
		y1e
		y2ef
		yen4n
		y2ere
		yes2
		y2es.
		ye4st
		ye2th
		y1f2
		y1g
		ygi2
		ygie5
		yg2l
		y1h
		yhr2
		y1i4
		y1j
		y1k2
		yke3n
		yk3s2
		y1l
		y2l3a2m
		yl4ante
		yl3c
		y4le.
		yli4n
		yloni1
		y2l1u
		yma2t
		ym3p2
		ympi1
		y2n1o
		yno4d
		ynt2
		y1of
		yom2
		yon4i
		y1ont
		y1ou
		y1p
		ypa2
		yp3an
		ype2
		y2pf
		y3ph
		y2p1in
		ypo3
		y4p3s
		y1r
		y3r2e
		y3ri
		yri2a
		yri1e
		y3r4o
		yrr2
		y1s
		ys2an
		ys2c
		yse1
		y3s2h
		y4s3l
		ysme3
		ys2pa
		yst4
		y2s1u2
		y3s2z
		y1t2
		y2te.
		y2tes
		y3to
		yu2r
		yure3
		y1v
		y1w
		y1y
		y1z2
		za2
		2z3ab
		zab3l
		za3cha
		za3chä
		z1ad
		2z1af
		za3ge
		za3gr
		3zah
		2z3ak
		zale3
		za3li
		2z1all
		2z1am
		3zambiq
		z1an
		za3ne
		2z3anf
		3zani
		2z3anl
		za3no
		za3ra
		2zarb
		2zarc
		za3re
		za3ri
		z1arm
		za3ro
		z1arti
		zar2tr
		2z1arz
		z1as
		zast4
		2z3at3
		3zaub
		z1au2f
		z3aug
		3zaun
		zä2
		2z1äc
		3z2äh
		2z1äm
		z1ärg
		z1ärm
		4z3b4
		zbü1b
		zbübe3
		2z3c
		2z3d2
		zdan2
		zdä1
		zeau3
		zeaus4
		2z1e2ben
		2zecho
		2z1eck
		ze1e
		2z1eff
		zeik4
		zei3la
		zeile4
		2z1ein
		zeinbus6
		zei3s2
		zeist4
		zei2t1a
		zeit5end
		zei4t3er
		zei2tr
		ze2l1a2
		ze2len
		ze2l1er
		ze2l1in
		zell2a
		zel4leh
		zel4lin
		zel3sz
		zel3t2h
		zelu2
		2z1emp
		5zen.
		ze4n3ac
		zen3n
		ze2no
		zens2e
		zen4sem
		3zent
		zent3s
		zen4zer
		z2er.
		ze2r3a
		ze2re2b
		2z1ergä
		4z3ergeb
		z3erhal
		2zerhö
		zerin4t
		zerk2
		z2erl.
		2zerlö
		z2ern
		zer4neb
		zer4n3ei
		2z1erq
		zers2
		2z1ersa
		4z3erste
		zert1a4
		zer4t3ag
		zert4an
		zer6tere
		zer4tin
		zer6t5rau
		4zerwei
		2z1erz
		3z2erza
		ze2s
		zes1e
		zes1i
		ze3sku
		zessen4
		zes6s5end
		zes2sp
		zes1tr
		ze2ß1
		ze2tr
		2zetts
		2z1ex
		2z1f4
		zfä4s3
		2z1g2
		zger2a
		2z1h
		z2hen
		zhir3
		3zi.
		zi3alo
		zi3ar
		zid3r
		zi1erh
		zi1es.
		3zig
		zil2e
		z2imm
		2z1imp
		zin2e
		zin4er
		2z1inf
		z1inh
		zin1it
		zin2sa
		zin4ser
		4zinsuf
		z1inv
		zi2o3
		zi3op
		zirk2
		zirk6s
		zi3s2z
		zit2h
		2z1j
		2z3k4
		2z1l2
		2z1m2
		zme2e
		2z3n4
		2z1ob
		2z1of
		zo2gl
		2z1oh
		3zol
		zon4ter
		zo2o
		2zope
		z1or
		zo2ri
		zor4ne
		2z1osz
		2z3ot
		2zö2f
		z1öl
		2z3p4
		2z1q
		2z3r2
		4z1s2
		z3sa
		z3sh
		z3sk
		z3str
		z3sz
		2z1t
		z2t1au
		z4tehe
		zte3str
		z3t2her
		zt3ho
		zt1ins
		zt3rec
		zt3s2
		zu3a
		zub4
		zu4c
		zud4
		zudi4
		zu2el
		zu3f4
		zu2g1ar
		zu4gent
		zu3gl
		zugs1t
		zug4ste
		zug1un
		2z1uhr
		zu1i
		zu3k
		2z1um.
		zumen2
		2zumf
		2zumg
		2zuml
		2z1ums
		zun2e
		2zunt
		zup2fi
		zu3r2a
		z1urk
		2z1url
		2z1urs
		2z1urt
		zu3s2
		zu3t2
		zuz2
		2züb
		zür1c
		2z1v
		zw2
		z1wac
		4zwah
		zwan2d1
		z2wang
		z1war
		2zwas
		4zwäl
		2zweg
		z2weig
		z1wei3s
		2z1wel
		2z1wen
		2z1wer
		z2werg
		2z1wes
		2zwet
		4zwir
		z2wit
		2z1wo
		z1wör
		z1wur
		2z1wü
		4z1z
		z3z4a
		zze3s
		z3z2o
		zz2ö
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
